fi: Juhlatorven tyyppi: Kierretorvi; Kazoo-tyyppinen torvi; Aukeava vappupilli; Trumpettityyppinen torvi; Muu
pl: Styl trąbki imprezowej: Trąbka spiralna; Trąbka w stylu kazoo; Rozwijana trąbka imprezowa; Trąbka w stylu klasycznym; Inne
el: Στυλ κόρνας πάρτι: Καραμούζα με σπειροειδή σωλήνα; Καραμούζα τύπου καζού; Ξετυλιγόμενη καραμούζα; Καραμούζα τύπου τρομπέτας; Άλλο
vi: Kiểu kèn tiệc tùng: Kèn dạng ống cuộn; Kèn kiểu kazoo; Kèn thổi cuộn; Kèn kiểu trumpet; Khác
zh-TW: 派對喇叭款式: 捲管派對喇叭; 卡祖笛風格喇叭; 吹龍喇叭; 小號風格喇叭; 其他
cs: Styl párty rohu: Zatočená trubka; Trubka ve stylu kazoo; Rozbalovací frkačka; Trubka ve stylu trumpety; Ostatní
sk-SK: Štýl párty trúbky: Rozbaľovacia trúbka; Trúbka v štýle kazoo; Frkačka; Trúbka v štýle trumpety; Iné
fr: Type de bruiteur de fête: Sans-gêne à tube enroulé; Corne de type kazoo; Sans-gêne déroulant; Corne de type trompette; Autre
es: estilo bocina de fiesta: Corneta de tubo enrollado; Corneta tipo kazoo; Espantasuegras desplegable; Corneta tipo trompeta; Otro
ja: パーティーホーンスタイル: コイルチューブホーン; カズー風ホーン; 吹き戻し; トランペット風ホーン; その他
lt-LT: Šventinio trimito tipas: Susukta švilpynė; Kazoo stiliaus švilpynė; Išsivyniojanti švilpynė; Trimitėlio stiliaus švilpynė; Kita
th: สไตล์แตรปาร์ตี้: แตรแบบท่อม้วน; แตรสไตล์คาซู; แตรกระดาษแบบเป่าแล้วยืดออก; แตรสไตล์ทรัมเป็ต; อื่นๆ
nl: Feesttoeter stijl: Opgerolde toeter; Toeter in kazoo-stijl; Roltoeter; Toeter in trompetstijl; Overig
hr-HR: Stil trube za zabavu: Truba sa spiralnom cijevi; Truba u stilu kazooa; Truba na razmotavanje; Truba u stilu trublje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стил на парти свирка: Спираловидна свирка; Свирка тип казу; Разгъваща се свирка; Свирка тип тромпет; Друго
de: Stil des Partyhorns: Spiralförmige Tröte; Tröte im Kazoo-Stil; Luftrüssel; Trompeten-Tröte; Sonstige
zh-CN: 派对号角样式: 卷管喇叭; 卡祖笛式喇叭; 吹龙玩具; 小号式喇叭; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo da corneta de festa: Corneta de tubo espiralado; Corneta tipo kazoo; Língua de sogra; Corneta tipo trompete; Outro
da: Festhornstil: Spiraltut; Kazoo-dyt; Tungedyt; Trompetlignende horn; Andet
ro-RO: Stil de goarnă de petrecere: Trompetă cu tub spiralat; Trompetă tip kazoo; Limbi de soacră; Trompetă clasică; Altele
ko: 파티 나팔 방식: 코일형 튜브 나팔; 카주 스타일 나팔; 코끼리 피리(롤아웃 블로아웃); 트럼펫 스타일 나팔; 기타
en: Party horn style: Coiled tube horn; Kazoo-style horn; Roll-out blowout; Trumpet-style horn; Other
sl-SI: Stil praznične piščalke: Zvita piščalka; Piščalka v obliki kazuja; Raztegljiva piščalka; Piščalka v obliki trobente; Drugo
sv: Stil för partyhorn: Spiraltuta; Kazooliknande tuta; Partyflärp; Trumpetliknande tuta; Övrigt
nb: Type festfløyte: Fløyte med spiralrør; Kazoo-lignende fløyte; Partyfløyte med rull; Trompetlignende fløyte; Annet
it: Stile della tromba da festa: Trombetta a spirale; Trombetta tipo kazoo; Lingua di Menelik; Trombetta stile tromba; Altro
tr: Parti kornası tarzı: Sarmal borulu düdük; Kazoo tarzı düdük; Uzatmalı kaynanadili; Trompet tarzı düdük; Diğer
pt-PT: estilo buzina de festa: Corneta de tubo enrolado; Corneta estilo kazoo; Língua da sogra; Corneta estilo trompete; Outro
ru: Стиль праздничного рожка: Гудок со свернутой трубкой; Дудочка-казу; Язычок-гудок (разворачивающийся); Дудочка в форме трубы; Другое
hu: Partikürt stílusa: Anyósnyelv; Kazoo stílusú duda; Kifújható duda; Trombita stílusú duda; Egyéb